Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.550

Discrimination by processor.

Any processor who discriminates between growers with whom he or she contracts as to price, conditions for production, harvesting, and delivery of crops which is not supportable by economic cost factors shall be in violation of this chapter and the director may subsequent to a hearing deny, suspend, or revoke such processor's license to act as a dealer.

[ 2011 c 336 s 593; 1977 ex.s. c 304 s 15; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 20.]